Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.118

Accelerated baccalaureate degree programs—Approval.

(1) State universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may develop accelerated baccalaureate degree programs that will allow academically qualified students to obtain a baccalaureate degree in three years without attending summer classes or enrolling in more than a full-time class load during the regular academic year. The programs must allow academically qualified students to begin coursework within their academic field during their first term or semester of enrollment.

(2) The state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall report on their plans for the accelerated baccalaureate degree programs to the student achievement council for approval.

[ 2012 c 229 s 511; 2011 c 108 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Intent—2011 c 108: "The legislature finds that some students are eager to complete a degree in the shortest time possible in order to enter the job market. The legislature further finds that providing a streamlined path to a baccalaureate degree would shorten the time required for students to complete a degree, improve the graduation rate, and improve accessibility for students who have proven academic abilities. The legislature intends to provide an accelerated baccalaureate degree program that will allow academically qualified students to obtain baccalaureate degrees in three years. The legislature finds that this streamlined path does not represent a new three-year standard for all students. The legislature intends to provide greater options to students, while not diminishing the quality or value of a standard baccalaureate degree. Further, the legislature intends that baccalaureate institutions explore reasonable possibilities for accelerated degree programs for academically qualified students." [ 2011 c 108 s 1.]